Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
COMMISSIONERS OF BOUNDARIES

§664-1 Judges as commissioners. The
circuit judges of the second, third, and fifth judicial circuits of the State
for their respective circuits, and the judge of the land court, for the first
judicial circuit, sitting without a jury, shall act as commissioners of
boundaries. [L 1894-5, c 14, §1; RL 1925, §552; am L 1932 2d, c 8, §1; RL 1935,
§3660; am imp L 1943, c 141; RL 1945, §10201; RL 1955, §234-1; HRS §664-1; am L
1972, c 90, §6(a)]

Note

By §73(c) of the Organic Act laws relating to settlement of
boundaries were continued in force until Congress should otherwise provide.
Continued in effect on admission of the State by Const. art. XVIII, §9.

Case Notes

Cited: 17 H. 539, 543 (1906); 35 H. 608, 658 (1940).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next